lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4463 Y 53
SFX 4463 is is . 75
SFX 4463 is io . 76
SFX 4463 is iam . 79
SFX 4463 is į . 80
SFX 4463 is iuo . 81
SFX 4463 is iame . 82
SFX 4463 is iuodu . 279
SFX 4463 is iedu . 318
SFX 4463 is iųdviejų . 280
SFX 4463 is iemdviem . 281
SFX 4463 is iedviem . 281
SFX 4463 is iemdviems . 282
SFX 4463 is iedviems . 282
SFX 4463 is iuodu . 283
SFX 4463 is iedu . 319
SFX 4463 is iemdviem . 284
SFX 4463 is iedviem . 284
SFX 4463 is iuodviejuose . 285
SFX 4463 is iuodviejuos . 286
SFX 4463 is ie . 77
SFX 4463 is ių . 78
SFX 4463 is iems . 83
SFX 4463 is iem . 84
SFX 4463 is iuos . 85
SFX 4463 is iais . 86
SFX 4463 is iuose . 87
SFX 4463 is i . 121
SFX 4463 is ios . 122
SFX 4463 is iai . 125
SFX 4463 is ią . 126
SFX 4463 is ia . 127
SFX 4463 is ioje . 128
SFX 4463 is ioj . 129
SFX 4463 is iedvi . 287
SFX 4463 is iodvi . 320
SFX 4463 is iuodvi . 320
SFX 4463 is iųdviejų . 288
SFX 4463 is iomdviem . 289
SFX 4463 is iodviem . 289
SFX 4463 is iomdviems . 290
SFX 4463 is iodviems . 290
SFX 4463 is iedvi . 291
SFX 4463 is iomdviem . 292
SFX 4463 is iodviem . 292
SFX 4463 is iodviejose . 321
SFX 4463 is ios . 123
SFX 4463 is ių . 124
SFX 4463 is ioms . 130
SFX 4463 is iom . 131
SFX 4463 is ias . 132
SFX 4463 is iomis . 133
SFX 4463 is iom . 262
SFX 4463 is iose . 135

SFX 4469 Y 4
SFX 4469 is ian . 90
SFX 4469 is iuosna . 91
SFX 4469 is ion . 139
SFX 4469 is iosna . 140

SFX 4520 Y 1
SFX 4520 is isai/461 . 155

SFX 4521 Y 1
SFX 4521 is isai/462 . 155

SFX 4522 Y 54
SFX 4522 is is . 75
SFX 4522 is s . 175
SFX 4522 is io . 76
SFX 4522 is iam . 79
SFX 4522 is į . 80
SFX 4522 is iuo . 81
SFX 4522 is iame . 82
SFX 4522 is iuodu . 279
SFX 4522 is iedu . 322
SFX 4522 is iųdviejų . 323
SFX 4522 is iemdviem . 307
SFX 4522 is iedviem . 307
SFX 4522 is iemdviems . 324
SFX 4522 is iedviems . 324
SFX 4522 is iuodu . 325
SFX 4522 is iedu . 326
SFX 4522 is iemdviem . 327
SFX 4522 is iedviem . 327
SFX 4522 is iuodviejuose . 308
SFX 4522 is iuodviejuos . 309
SFX 4522 is ie . 77
SFX 4522 is ių . 78
SFX 4522 is iems . 83
SFX 4522 is iem . 84
SFX 4522 is iuos . 85
SFX 4522 is iais . 86
SFX 4522 is iuose . 87
SFX 4522 is i . 121
SFX 4522 is ios . 122
SFX 4522 is iai . 125
SFX 4522 is ią . 126
SFX 4522 is ia . 127
SFX 4522 is ioje . 128
SFX 4522 is ioj . 129
SFX 4522 is iedvi . 287
SFX 4522 is iodvi . 328
SFX 4522 is iuodvi . 328
SFX 4522 is iųdviejų . 329
SFX 4522 is iomdviem . 310
SFX 4522 is iodviem . 310
SFX 4522 is iomdviems . 330
SFX 4522 is iodviems . 330
SFX 4522 is iedvi . 331
SFX 4522 is iomdviem . 332
SFX 4522 is iodviem . 332
SFX 4522 is iodviejose . 321
SFX 4522 is ios . 123
SFX 4522 is ių . 124
SFX 4522 is ioms . 130
SFX 4522 is iom . 131
SFX 4522 is ias . 132
SFX 4522 is iomis . 133
SFX 4522 is iom . 262
SFX 4522 is iose . 135

SFX 4529 Y 4
SFX 4529 is ian . 90
SFX 4529 is iuosna . 91
SFX 4529 is ion . 139
SFX 4529 is iosna . 140

SFX 4580 Y 1
SFX 4580 is sai/461 . 155

SFX 4581 Y 1
SFX 4581 is sai/462 . 155

SFX 4582 Y 33
SFX 4582 ts ts . 75
SFX 4582 ts ties . 76
SFX 4582 ts čio . 333
SFX 4582 ts čiam . 79
SFX 4582 ts tį . 80
SFX 4582 ts čiu . 81
SFX 4582 ts timi . 334
SFX 4582 ts tim . 335
SFX 4582 ts čiame . 82
SFX 4582 ts čiam . 113
SFX 4582 ts tys . 77
SFX 4582 ts čių . 78
SFX 4582 ts tiems . 83
SFX 4582 ts tiem . 84
SFX 4582 ts čius . 85
SFX 4582 ts čiais . 86
SFX 4582 ts čiuose . 87
SFX 4582 ts čiuos . 88
SFX 4582 ts ti . 121
SFX 4582 ts čios . 122
SFX 4582 ts čiai . 125
SFX 4582 ts čią . 126
SFX 4582 ts čia . 127
SFX 4582 ts čioje . 128
SFX 4582 ts čioj . 129
SFX 4582 ts čios . 123
SFX 4582 ts čių . 124
SFX 4582 ts čioms . 130
SFX 4582 ts čiom . 131
SFX 4582 ts čias . 132
SFX 4582 ts čiomis . 133
SFX 4582 ts čiom . 262
SFX 4582 ts čiose . 135

SFX 4592 Y 4
SFX 4592 ts čian . 90
SFX 4592 ts čiuosna . 91
SFX 4592 ts čion . 139
SFX 4592 ts čiosna . 140

SFX 4593 Y 2
SFX 4593 ts čiu . 92
SFX 4593 ts ti . 141

SFX 4621 Y 1
SFX 4621 ts tsai/461 . 155

SFX 4622 Y 1
SFX 4622 ts tsai/462 . 155

SFX 4623 Y 1
SFX 4623 ts tsai/463 . 155

SFX 4624 Y 17
SFX 4624 a a . 94
SFX 4624 a os . 95
SFX 4624 a ai . 98
SFX 4624 a ą . 99
SFX 4624 a a . 100
SFX 4624 a oje . 101
SFX 4624 a oj . 116
SFX 4624 a a . 108
SFX 4624 a os . 96
SFX 4624 a ų . 97
SFX 4624 a oms . 102
SFX 4624 a om . 103
SFX 4624 a as . 104
SFX 4624 a omis . 105
SFX 4624 a om . 143
SFX 4624 a ose . 106
SFX 4624 a os . 109

SFX 4632 Y 2
SFX 4632 a on . 110
SFX 4632 a osna . 111

SFX 4643 Y 6
SFX 4643 as as . 230
SFX 4643 as o . 231
SFX 4643 as am . 232
SFX 4643 as ą . 233
SFX 4643 as uo . 234
SFX 4643 as ame . 235

SFX 4649 Y 1
SFX 4649 as an . 238

SFX 4650 Y 17
SFX 4650 i i . 196
SFX 4650 i ių . 197
SFX 4650 i iems . 198
SFX 4650 i iem . 224
SFX 4650 i is [^r]i 200
SFX 4650 i ius ri 200
SFX 4650 i iais . 201
SFX 4650 i iuose . 202
SFX 4650 i iuos . 203
SFX 4650 i ios . 205
SFX 4650 i ių . 206
SFX 4650 i ioms . 207
SFX 4650 i iom . 226
SFX 4650 i ias . 209
SFX 4650 i iomis . 210
SFX 4650 i iom . 227
SFX 4650 i iose . 212

SFX 4659 Y 2
SFX 4659 i iuosna . 221
SFX 4659 i iosna . 222

SFX 4669 Y 6
SFX 4669 as as . 230
SFX 4669 as o . 231
SFX 4669 as ui . 232
SFX 4669 as ą . 233
SFX 4669 as u . 234
SFX 4669 as e . 235

SFX 4675 Y 1
SFX 4675 as an . 238

SFX 4676 Y 7
SFX 4676 a a . 230
SFX 4676 a os . 231
SFX 4676 a ai . 232
SFX 4676 a a . 233
SFX 4676 a a . 234
SFX 4676 a oje . 235
SFX 4676 a oj . 236

SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 a on . 238

SFX 4684 Y 7
SFX 4684 dešimt dešimt . 228
SFX 4684 dešimt dešimtis . 121
SFX 4684 dešimt dešimties . 122
SFX 4684 dešimt dešimčiai . 125
SFX 4684 dešimt dešimtį . 126
SFX 4684 dešimt dešimčia . 127
SFX 4684 dešimt dešimtyje . 128

SFX 4691 Y 1
SFX 4691 dešimt dešimtin . 139

SFX 4692 Y 32
SFX 4692 is is . 75
SFX 4692 is io . 76
SFX 4692 is iam . 79
SFX 4692 is į . 80
SFX 4692 is iu . 81
SFX 4692 is iame . 82
SFX 4692 is iam . 113
SFX 4692 is iai . 77
SFX 4692 is ių . 78
SFX 4692 is iams . 83
SFX 4692 is iam . 84
SFX 4692 is iems . 83
SFX 4692 is iem . 84
SFX 4692 is ius . 85
SFX 4692 is iais . 86
SFX 4692 is iuose . 87
SFX 4692 is iuos . 88
SFX 4692 is ė . 121
SFX 4692 is ės . 122
SFX 4692 is ei . 125
SFX 4692 is ę . 126
SFX 4692 is e . 127
SFX 4692 is ėje . 128
SFX 4692 is ėj . 129
SFX 4692 is ės . 123
SFX 4692 is ių . 124
SFX 4692 is ėms . 130
SFX 4692 is ėm . 131
SFX 4692 is es . 132
SFX 4692 is ėmis . 133
SFX 4692 is ėm . 134
SFX 4692 is ėse . 135

SFX 4699 Y 4
SFX 4699 is ian . 90
SFX 4699 is iuosna . 91
SFX 4699 is ėn . 139
SFX 4699 is ėsna . 140

SFX 4700 Y 2
SFX 4700 is iu . 92
SFX 4700 is i . 141

AF 4692,4699,65521 # 336
AF 4522,4529,4580,4581,65521 # 339
AF 4650,4659,65521 # 340
AF 4669,4675,65521 # 341
AF 4684,4691,65521 # 342
AF 4676,4683,65521 # 344
AF 4643,4649,65521 # 347
AF 4582,4592,4621,4622,65521 # 407
AF 4463,4469,4520,4521,65521 # 429
AF 4624,4632,65521 # 431
