lt-LT_morphology.dic
jūsiškis/336	21
kažkuris/339	21
keleri/340	21
keletas/341	21
keli/340	21
keliasdešimt/342	21
keliolika/344	21
kieka/344	21
kitkas/347	21
kuris/339	21
maniškis/336	21
mūsiškis/336	21
pats/407	21
saviškis/336	21
šis/429	21
tamsta/431	21
taviškis/336	21
viskas/347	21
nekuris/339	70
